Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 1. Prevention of Accident and Health Hazards.
Sec. 18.60.093.
Enforcement procedures.

If, after an inspection or investigation, or after an employer’s failure to correct a violation for which the employer has been issued a notice, the department issues a citation, the commissioner shall, at a reasonable time after the termination of the inspection or investigation, or expiration of the time period set out in the notice, notify the employer by certified mail of the penalty proposed to be assessed and that the employer has 15 working days within which to notify the commissioner and the OSHA Review Board that the employer wishes to contest the citation or proposed assessment of penalty. If, within 15 working days after receipt of the penalty notice issued by the commissioner, the employer fails to notify the OSHA Review Board that the employer intends to contest the citation or proposed assessment of penalty, the citation and the assessment, as proposed, are considered final and not subject to review by any court.

If the commissioner has reason to believe that an employer has failed to correct, within the period allowed, a violation for which a citation has been issued, the commissioner shall notify the employer by certified mail of the failure, of the penalty proposed to be assessed because of the failure, and that the employer has 15 working days within which to notify the commissioner and the OSHA Review Board of a wish to contest the commissioner’s notification of the proposed assessment of penalty. If, within 15 working days from the receipt of the notification issued by the commissioner, the employer fails to give notice of an intention to contest the notification or proposed assessment of penalty, the notification and assessment as proposed shall be considered a final order and not subject to review by any court.

If an employer gives notice of an intention to contest the citation or notification issued under (a) or (b) of this section, the OSHA Review Board shall afford an opportunity for a hearing and thereafter issue an order, based on findings of fact, affirming, modifying, or vacating the original citation or proposed penalty, or directing other appropriate relief, and the order is final 30 days after its issuance.

The OSHA Review Board shall notify the authorized representative of the affected employees that an employer is contesting a citation or notification issued under (a) or (b) of this section and afford the representative an opportunity to participate in the hearing on the matter.

An employer, an affected employee, or a representative of affected employees has 15 working days from the receipt of a citation within which to notify the commissioner and the OSHA Review Board that the period of time fixed in the citation for the abatement of a violation is unreasonable. The OSHA Review Board shall afford an opportunity for a hearing and thereafter issue an order, based on findings of fact, affirming or modifying the original period for abatement, and the order is final 30 days after its issuance. If the contest is initiated by the employer, the OSHA Review Board shall notify the employees in the same manner as provided by (d) of this section. If the contest is initiated by the employees, the OSHA Review Board shall notify the employer and afford the employer an opportunity to participate in the hearing on the matter.

If an employer fails without good cause to appear at a hearing held under this section after receiving proper notice of the hearing, the OSHA Review Board may order the employer to pay all reasonable expenses incurred by the board for the hearing, including the board’s actual travel expenses and per diem.

The board shall request the chief administrative law judge (AS

44.64.020

) to appoint an administrative law judge employed or retained by the office of administrative hearings to preside at a hearing conducted under this section. AS

44.64.060

and

44.64.070

do not apply to the hearing. The administrative law judge who presided at the hearing shall be present during the consideration of the case and, if requested by the board, shall assist and advise the board. A member of the board who has not heard all of the evidence may not vote on the decision.

History.

(§ 7 ch 72 SLA 1973; am § 2 ch 26 SLA 1983; am § 2 ch 116 SLA 1992; am § 34 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For inspections, citations, and proposed penalties, see 8 AAC 61, art. 2.

For occupational safety and health review board, see 8 AAC 61, art. 3.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Agencies assessed penalties under this section and AS

18.60.095

must, as a general rule, pay those penalties, within the limits of available appropriations, from their operating budgets.
In the event an agency wishes to contest a citation, the agency may be represented by its assigned counsel in the Attorney General’s Office before the Occupational Safety and Health Act Review Board; if the agency chooses to contest an adverse determination by the review board, outside counsel, funded by the agency, will have to be employed.
March 27, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.60.095.
Penalties.

An employer who wilfully or repeatedly violates a provision of AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

that is applicable to the employer or a standard or regulation adopted under AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

may be assessed by the commissioner a civil penalty of not more than the maximum amount or less than the minimum amount established by regulation under (i) of this section for each violation.

An employer who receives a citation for a serious violation of a provision of AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

that is applicable to the employer or of a standard or regulation adopted under AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

shall be assessed by the commissioner a civil penalty of not more than the maximum amount established by regulation under (i) of this section. For purposes of this subsection, a serious violation is considered to exist if the violation creates in the place of employment a substantial probability of death or serious physical harm. However, a serious violation is not considered to exist if the employer did not, and could not with the exercise of reasonable diligence, know of the presence of the violation.

An employer who receives a citation for a violation of a provision of AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

that is applicable to the employer or a standard or regulation adopted under AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

, and the violation is specifically determined not to be of a serious nature, may be assessed by the commissioner a civil penalty of not more than the maximum amount established by regulation under (i) of this section.

An employer who fails to correct a violation within the period permitted for its correction for which a citation has been issued may be assessed by the commissioner a civil penalty of not more than the maximum amount established by regulation under (i) of this section.

An employer who wilfully or repeatedly violates a provision of AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

that is applicable to the employer or a standard or regulation adopted under AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

, and the violation causes death to an employee, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not more than $10,000, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both. However, upon a second conviction after a prior conviction for a violation causing death, an employer is punishable by a fine of not more than $20,000, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both. This subsection does not preclude prosecution of the employer under AS 11.

A person who knowingly makes a false statement, representation, or certification with the intent to mislead in an application, record, report, plan or other document filed or required to be maintained under AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

is guilty of unsworn falsification in the second degree.

An employer who violates the posting requirements of AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

shall be assessed by the commissioner a civil penalty of not more than the maximum amount established by regulation under (i) of this section.

In assessing a civil penalty, the commissioner shall give due consideration to the size of the business of the employer being charged, the gravity of the violation, the good faith of the employer, and the history of previous violations.

The commissioner shall establish by regulation the maximum civil penalty amounts to be imposed under (a) — (d) and (g) of this section and the minimum civil penalty amount to be imposed for wilful violations under (a) of this section. The maximum amount of the civil penalties may not be greater than the corresponding federal penalty for the specified violations, as provided under 29 U.S.C. 666 (Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970), and must include any adjustments made to the penalties under 28 U.S.C. 2461 (Federal Civil Penalties Inflation Adjustment Act Improvements Act of 2015).

History.

(§ 7 ch 72 SLA 1973; am §§ 3 — 9 ch 116 SLA 1992; am § 15 ch 42 SLA 2006; am §§ 1 — 6 ch 12 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1989, “or” was substituted for “of” in subsection (c) to correct a manifest error in the original enactment.

Cross references. —

For crime of unsworn falsification, referred to in (f) of this section, see AS

11.56.210

.

For provision providing that the 2018 changes to this section “apply to violations occurring on or after August 14, 2018”, see sec. 7, ch. 12. SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For inspections, citations, and proposed penalties, see 8 AAC 61, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 14, 2018, in (a), substituted “the maximum amount or less than the minimum amount established by regulation under (i) of this section for each violation” for “$70,000 for each violation. Except when a settlement is negotiated, the commissioner shall assess a minimum penalty of $5,000 for a violation under this subsection, that was committed willfully” at the end; in (b) (c), and (g),
substituted “not more than the maximum amount established by regulation under (i) of this section” for “up to $7,000 for each violation” at the end of the first sentence; in (d), substituted “the maximum amount established by regulation under (i) of this section” for “$7,000 for each day during which the failure to correct the violation continues” at the end; added (i).

Opinions of attorney general. —

Agencies assessed penalties under AS

18.60.093

and this section must, as a general rule, pay those penalties, within the limits of available appropriations, from their operating budgets.
In the event an agency wishes to contest a citation, the agency may be represented by its assigned counsel in the Attorney General’s Office before the Occupational Safety and Health Act Review Board; if the agency chooses to contest an adverse determination by the review board, outside counsel, funded by the agency, will have to be employed.
March 27, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen.

The state may enforce the criminal penalties set out in subsections (e) and (f) on the Annette Islands Reserve. May 3, 1983 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.60.096.
Imminent dangers.

The commissioner, or a designated agent as authorized by the commissioner, may issue orders restraining a particular condition or practice in any place of employment that constitutes a danger that could reasonably be expected to immediately cause death or serious physical harm. The terms of an order issued under this section may require steps to be taken as necessary to avoid, correct, or remove the imminent danger and may prohibit the employment or presence of an individual in locations or under conditions where imminent danger exists. The terms of the order may allow the presence of individuals necessary to avoid, correct, or remove the imminent danger.

When and as soon as a representative of the department concludes that conditions or practices described in (a) of this section exist in any place of employment, the representative shall inform the affected employees and employer of the danger and that the representative is recommending to the commissioner, or a designated agent as authorized by the commissioner, the issuance of a restraining order.

The attorney general shall, when requested by the commissioner, seek an injunction in superior court to enforce a restraining order issued under this section.

If the commissioner arbitrarily or capriciously fails to issue a restraining order under this section, an employee who may be injured by reason of the failure, or the representative of the affected employees, may bring an action against the commissioner in superior court to compel the commissioner to issue a restraining order and for further relief as may be appropriate.

History.

(§ 7 ch 72 SLA 1973; am § 32 ch 127 SLA 1974)

Administrative Code. —

For inspections, citations, and proposed penalties, see 8 AAC 61, art. 2.

Sec. 18.60.097.
Judicial review.

A person affected by an order of the OSHA Review Board under AS

18.60.093(c)

or (e) or of the commissioner under AS

18.60.096

may obtain a review of the order by filing a notice of appeal in the superior court as provided in the Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure.

The department may obtain review of an order of the OSHA Review Board under AS

18.60.093(c)

or (e) by filing a notice of appeal in the superior court as provided in the Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure.

An order of the OSHA Review Board under AS

18.60.093(c)

or (e) or of the commissioner under AS

18.60.096

becomes final and is not subject to review by any court if a notice of appeal is not filed with the superior court within the period provided for by the Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure.

An employer seeking judicial review of an order of the OSHA Review Board or of the commissioner must inform the affected employees of the fact that the employer is seeking judicial review.

The court shall review an order of the OSHA Review Board or of the commissioner on a substantial-evidence basis.

History.

(§ 7 ch 72 SLA 1973; am § 7 ch 276 SLA 1976; am §§ 31, 32 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1991, “the Alaska Rules of Appellate Procedure” was substituted for “Rule 45 of the Rules of Appellate Procedure of the State of Alaska” to correct a manifest error in a reference to law.

Sec. 18.60.098.
Employee compensation for appearances.

The employer shall compensate any of the employer’s employees who appear at a board hearing under AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

for loss of wages if the employee appears at the hearing as the result of a request of the employer or as the result of a subpoena issued at the employer’s request.

The employer shall compensate any of the employer’s employees who appear at a judicial proceeding under AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

for loss of wages if the employee appears at the proceeding as the result of a request of the employer or as the result of a subpoena issued at the employer’s request.

An employee who appears at a board hearing under AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

as the result of a request of the state or the OSHA Review Board or as the result of a subpoena issued at the request of the state or the OSHA Review Board shall be compensated at the rate of $30 a day and transportation costs.

History.

(§ 7 ch 72 SLA 1973)

Sec. 18.60.099.
Confidentiality of trade secrets.

Information obtained by the department in connection with an inspection or proceeding related to enforcement of occupational safety and health standards that contains or that might reveal a trade secret referred to in 18 U.S.C. 1905 is confidential.
However, the information may be disclosed to other officers or employees concerned with carrying out occupational safety and health enforcement activities.
In a proceeding, the commissioner or the court as may be applicable shall issue orders as may be appropriate to protect the confidentiality of trade secrets.

History.

(§ 7 ch 72 SLA 1973)

Administrative Code. —

For inspections, citations, and proposed penalties, see 8 AAC 61, art. 2.

Sec. 18.60.100.
Nonabrogation of powers of Department of Health and Social Services.

AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

are not intended to abrogate the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Department of Health and Social Services in carrying out the provisions of this title and AS 17.

History.

(§ 7 ch 148 SLA 1957; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971)

Sec. 18.60.105.
Definitions.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, in AS

18.60.010

—

18.60.105

,

“be exposed” means to ingest, inhale, or absorb through the skin or eyes a substance or physical agent, or fumes or other potentially harmful aspect of a substance or physical agent;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of labor and workforce development;

“department” means the Department of Labor and Workforce Development;

“employee” means a person who works for an employer;

“employer” means a person, including the state and political subdivisions of the state, who has one or more employees;

“OSHA” means the federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration;

“physical agent” means a physical agent that exceeds the threshold established in the 1986-1987 edition of “Threshold Limit Values for Chemical Substances and Physical Agents in the Work Environment” published by the American Conference of Governmental Industrial Hygienists;

“suitable protective equipment” includes such personal protective equipment as is required by regulation issued under this chapter;

“toxic or hazardous substance”

includes

a chemical listed in 29 C.F.R. Part 1910, Subpart Z, Toxic and Hazardous Substances, “General Industry Standards”, Occupational Safety and Health Administration;

a chemical listed in “Threshold Limit Values for Chemical Substances and Physical Agents in the Work Environment”, American Conference of Governmental Industrial Hygienists (Latest Edition);

a substance for which an OSHA form 20 or equivalent information is required under OSHA regulations; and

a substance determined by the department, in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), to be a health hazard to an employee who is exposed to the substance, including a carcinogen, reproductive toxin, irritant, corrosive, sensitizer, hepatotoxin, nephrotoxin, neurotoxin, agent that acts on the hematopoietic system, agent that damages the lungs, a cutaneous hazard, and an eye hazard;

does not include

substances that because of their physical state, volume, or concentration do not pose a health hazard upon exposure;

substances that are goods, food, drugs, cosmetics, or tobacco products intended for personal consumption; or

substances in transit;

“transit” means conveyed in a sealed or unopened container by a mode of transportation.

In AS

18.60.030

(14),

18.60.065

—

18.60.068

, and (a)(9) of this section,

“employee” means a person who works for an employer, but not in a place used primarily as a personal residence;

“employer” means a person, including the state and a political subdivision of the state, who has one or more employees working in a place not used primarily as a personal residence;

“health hazard” means a substance or physical agent capable of causing acute or chronic adverse effects to health;

“workplace” means a place of employment other than a place used primarily as a personal residence.

History.

(§ 43-2-21 ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 148 SLA 1957; am § 8 ch 72 SLA 1973; am §§ 3, 4 ch 93 SLA 1983; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 35 SLA 1987)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (a) was reorganized in 1983 to alphabetize the defined terms and in 1987 to maintain alphabetical order. In 1994, in subsection (b), a reference to “(a)(9)” was substituted for a reference to “(a)(10)” to correct a manifest error in § 4, ch. 93, SLA 1983. In 2002, at the beginning of subsection (a) “Except as provided in (b) of this section,” was inserted to correct a manifest error in ch. 93, SLA 1983. In 2002, former paragraphs (a)(9) and (10) were combined to form (a)(9)(A) and (B), to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes, and former paragraph (a)(11) was renumbered as (a)(10).

In 1999, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” and “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Department of Labor [now Department of Labor and Workforce Development] can publish its list of designated toxic and hazardous substances pursuant to
AS

18.60.030

(12) and subsection (a) without going through the promulgation proceeding in the Administrative Procedure Act.
The list is merely a compilation of chemicals and substances from sources already identified by the legislature.
July 18, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

As the list to be published by the Department of Labor [now Department of Labor and Workforce Development] under
AS

18.60.030

(12) includes those chemicals and substances described in paragraph (a)(8) [now (a)(9)(A)], they are coextensive.
July 18, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Labor [now Department of Labor and Workforce Development] does not have the authority, under subparagraph (a)(9)(A) [now (a)(9)(B)(i)], to promulgate regulations excluding from its list of toxic and hazardous substances those described under subparagraph (a)(8)(A) and (B) [now (a)(9)(A)(i) and (ii)].
July 18, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Cosmetic products, when used by employees in a commercial establishment, do not fall within the exemption for products intended for personal consumption under subparagraph (a)(9)(B) [now (a)(9)(B)(ii)]; therefore, AS

18.60.065

requires that material safety data sheets be provided for cosmetics to be used in commercial establishments.
November 1, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.